dictsource/ta_rules
/***************************************************************************
 *   Copyright (C) 2009 to 2014 by Jonathan Duddington                     *
 *   email: jonsd@users.sourceforge.net                                    *
 *                                                                         *
 *   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify  *
 *   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by  *
 *   the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the License, or     *
 *   (at your option) any later version.                                   *
 *                                                                         *
 *   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,       *
 *   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of        *
 *   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the         *
 *   GNU General Public License for more details.                          *
 *                                                                         *
 *   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License     *
 *   along with this program; if not, see:                                 *
 *               <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.                           *
 ***************************************************************************/

// This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Tamil

// B means a combining vowel sign, or a virama
// K means a consonant or end-of-word
// phoneme [V#] means vowel [V], but NULL if the next phoneme is a vowel or [#]


.replace
௦	0	// Tamil numbers
௧	1
௨	2
௩	3
௪	4
௫	5
௬	6
௭	7
௮	8
௯	9

ொ	ொ
ோ	ோ
ௌ	ௌ

// க is k when preceded by these
.L01 ஷ்  ஸ்  ட்

// ப is p when preceded by these
.L02 ட்  ற்  ஷ்  ஸ்

// 'a' 'e' 'i'
.L03 இ  எ  அ

// alternative 's' characters
.L04 ச ஸ

// alternative 'r' characters
.L05 ர  ற

// H or g
.L06 க  ஹ

// aU or el.
.L07 ௌ ெள 

// i or i:
.L08 ி  ீ

// n or n or n.
.L09 ந  ன ண 

// l or l.
.L10 ல  ள

// b d g
.L11 ப த க

// words before "bottle"
.L12 பீர்  கலர் சாராய சோடா தண்ணி தண்ணீர் பிராந்தி வாட்டர் விஸ்கி  பிளாஸ்டிக் ப்ளாஸ்டிக் கண்ணாடி கிளாஸ் க்ளாஸ் மது மருந்து ஊறுகா ஊறுகாய்  குடிநீர் 

// words after "booga"
.L13 வாழ்க்கை பூமி விருந்த மனிதன

.L14 நெருப்பு நெருப்புப் தீ தீப் 

// words after 'full'
.L15 மீல்ஸ கிளாஸ பாட்டில டிக்கெட் டாஸ

// words after பாதிக்கும்
.L16 மேல  மேற்  குறை அதிக 

// words after செல்லக் [tSellVg] செல்லப் [tSellVb] செல்லத் [tSellVd]
.L17 குழந்தை கிளி குட்டி கழுதை குதிரை குரங்க 
.L18 பிள்ளை பெண் பையன பெயர  பேர  பேத்தி 
.L19 தம்பி தங்க 

// words after கோரப் [go:rVb]
.L20 பல் பற் போர போர  பசி 

// words before பாவ+
.L21 நேய ராக சகோதர சாந்த சிநேக சினேக முக முகத்தின் ராகங்களின் ராகத்தின் சம சமமான சமமாக சமநிலை அலட்சிய 

// words after போஸ்
.L22 கொட தந்த அளி காட்ட 

// words before பில்டர+  ("filter")
.L23 காபி காஃபி வாட்டர் தண்ணி தண்ணீர் ஏர் 

// words after  தம் 
.L24 அடிக்க அடித்த அடிப்ப பிடிக்க பிடித்த பிடிப்ப எடுக்க எடுத்த எடுப்ப பிடி அடி கட்ட 

// words after பாலே 
.L25 நடன டான்ஸ நாட்டிய 

// words after கேஸ்
.L26 சிலிண்டர  ஸ்டவ் கனெக் அடுப்ப 

// words after சிரத்தை
.L27 _உண்ட _ஏற்பட _இல்ல   யிரு  யாக  யி யுடன	யை	 

// [aU] at start of word
.L28 ஔ  ஒள  // அவு  

//words after கிளிக் (click)
.L29  செய்  பண் 

// words after கோல்ட் (gold)
.L30  மெடல  பிஷ  ஃபிஷ 

// endings after போர்ட  (board)
.L31  ்_  ிங்  ின  ை  ுக்க  ில  ும 

// words after அர்த்த
.L32  ராத்திரி  ஜாம  நிசி  வேளை 

// words after ரிப்பன் 
.L33  மாளிகை  கட்டிட  அலுவலக  பில்டிங் வளாக 

// words after டச்  (touch)
.L34  செய்  செஞ்  பண்  அப் 

// words after கோல் (goal)
.L35  அடி  போட  கணக்  கீப்  எல்லை 

// before suffix ப்பிரசவ
.L36 ஹிமாசல  இமாசல  அருணாசல  ஆந்திர  _மத்திய   உத்திர 

// word before போக+
.L37 முதல்  இரண்டு  மூன்று  முதலாம்  இரண்டாம்  மூன்றாம்  

// after prefix தீர்க்க  [di:rgg]
.L38 மில் மா முள்ள ாயு த்தால த்தோட த்துடன தரிச ம்_ முள்ள _சுமங்கலி _தரிசன



// consonants

.group க
	க்ஷ 	ks.V
	க்ஷ (B	ks.

	க	gV   // inter-vocalic, unless there is virama before or after
	க (B	g
     _) க	kV
     _) க (B	k
     _) க (T	gV	// if word has $alt attribute in ta_list
     _) க (BT+	g	// $alt
	க் (க	k
     க்) க	kV#
     ற்) க	_kV
     ற்) க (B	_k
   L01) க	kV
   L01) க (B	k
	க (ிரு	k
	க (ூட	k

	க (ீத		g
	க (ஜ		gV
	க் (_க		k
